Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Administration

§ 5321.
Secretary of State’s Office duties.

The Office shall:

provide general information to applicants for commissioning as a notary public;

administer fees as provided under section 5324 of this chapter;

explain appeal procedures to notaries public and applicants and explain complaint procedures to the public; and

receive applications for commissioning, review applications, and grant and renew commissions when appropriate under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2019.

§ 5322.
Advisor appointees.

The Secretary of State shall appoint two notaries public to serve as advisors in matters relating to notarial acts. One of the advisors shall be an attorney selected from a list of at least three licensed attorneys provided by the Vermont Bar Association. The advisors shall be appointed for staggered five-year terms and serve at the pleasure of the Secretary. One of the initial appointments shall be for less than a five-year term.

Each appointee shall have at least three years of experience as a notary public during the period immediately preceding appointment and shall be actively commissioned in Vermont and remain in good standing during incumbency.

The Office shall seek the advice of the advisor appointees in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The appointees shall be entitled to compensation and reimbursement of expenses as set forth in

32 V.S.A. § 1010

for attendance at any meeting called by the Office for this purpose.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2019.

§ 5323.
Rules.

The Office, with the advice of the advisor appointees, may adopt rules to implement this chapter. The rules may:

prescribe the manner of performing notarial acts regarding tangible and electronic records;

include provisions to ensure that any change to or tampering with a record bearing a certificate of a notarial act is self-evident;

include provisions to ensure integrity in the creation, transmittal, storage, or authentication of electronic records or signatures;

prescribe the process of granting, renewing, conditioning, denying, suspending, or revoking the commission of or otherwise disciplining a notary public and assuring the trustworthiness of an individual holding a commission as notary public;

include provisions to prevent fraud or mistake in the performance of notarial acts; and

prescribe standards for remote online notarization, including standards for credential analysis, the process through which a third person affirms the identity of an individual, the methods for communicating through a secure communication link, the means by which the remote notarization is certified, and the form of notice to be appended disclosing the fact that the notarization was completed remotely on any document acknowledged through remote online notarization.

Rules adopted regarding the performance of notarial acts with respect to electronic records and remote online notarization may not require, or accord greater legal status or effect to, the implementation or application of a specific technology or technical specification. In adopting, amending, or repealing rules regarding notarial acts with respect to electronic records and remote online notarization, the Office shall consider, as far as is consistent with this chapter:

the most recent standards regarding electronic records and remote online notarization promulgated by national bodies, such as the National Association of Secretaries of State;

standards, practices, and customs of other jurisdictions that substantially enact this chapter; and

the views of governmental officials and entities and other interested persons.

Neither electronic notarization nor remote online notarization shall be allowed until the Secretary of State has adopted rules and prescribed standards in these areas.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2019.

§ 5324.
Fees.

For the issuance of a commission as a notary public, the Office shall collect a fee of $15.00.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2019.